Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 1. Hydraulic Brake Fluids

§ 2831.
Hydraulic brake fluids.

No person may distribute or provide any fluid for use in the hydraulic brake system of a motor vehicle unless it meets the minimum standards established by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and unless the container bears a statement of its SAE classifications.
The Commissioner shall adopt standards for quality of brake fluids based on the classification of the society of automotive engineers to ensure safe operation of motor vehicles.

HISTORY:

Added

1963, No. 42

, eff. Jan. 1, 1964.